Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2477.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 44BEHAVIORAL HEALTH BENEFITS FORJUSTICE-INVOLVED CHILDRENSec.4401. Definitions.4402. Coverage for screenings, assessments and services.§ 4401. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 1234567891011121314151617181920 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agreement with the Department of Human Services." As defined in section 2102 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Authorized representative." Any of the following:(1) A person, including a behavioral health provider, to whom a covered person or enrollee has given express written consent to represent the covered person or enrollee in a complaint, grievance, adverse benefit determination, internal appeal or external review process.(2) A person authorized by law to provide substituted consent for a covered person or enrollee.(3) A family member or behavioral health provider involved in providing behavioral health services to a covered person or enrollee if the covered person or enrollee is incapacitated or unable to provide consent due to a medical emergency or as necessary to prevent a serious and imminent threat to the health or safety of the covered person or enrollee."Behavioral health assessment." A face-to-face interview with an individual that includes an evaluation of the behavioral health, medical, psychological, social, vocational and educational factors important to the individual."Behavioral health condition." Includes:(1) A mental health condition.(2) A substance use disorder."Behavioral health provider."(1) Any of the following:(i) A professional who specializes in the treatment 20260HB2477PN3327 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and management of behavioral health conditions.(ii) An individual who manages or supports behavioral health conditions whether or not the individual has a medical background.(2) The term includes a psychologist, psychiatrist, nurse, peer, patient navigator, therapist, substance use disorder treatment and mental health counselor, recovery coach, case worker, social worker, psychiatric aide or technician or paraprofessional working in a psychiatric rehabilitation or substance use recovery field."Behavioral health service." A covered treatment, admission, procedure, medical supply or equipment or other service, prescribed or otherwise provided or proposed to be provided by a behavioral health provider to a covered person or enrollee for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure or relief of a behavioral health condition under the terms of a health insurance policy or an agreement with the Department of Human Services."Covered person." As defined in section 2102 of The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Enrollee." As defined in section 2102 of The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Government program."(1) The Commonwealth's medical assistance program established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(2) The program for comprehensive health care for uninsured children established under Article XXIII-A of The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Health care service." As defined in section 2102 of The 20260HB2477PN3327 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Insurance Company Law of 1921."Health insurance policy." As defined in section 2102 of The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Insurer." As defined in section 2102 of The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Mental health condition." A condition that involves changes in thinking, mood or behavior that can make daily activities difficult and impair an individual's ability to work, interact with family and fulfill other major life functions."Screening." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 6302 (relating to definitions)."Substance use disorder." A health condition characterized by a cluster of cognitive, behavioral and physiological symptoms that describe an individual's compulsive use of a substance despite significant adverse problems associated with the use."Treatment plan." An individualized plan of treatment as described in section 107 of the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act, which imposes the least restrictive alternative consistent with affording an individual adequate and appropriate treatment for the individual's condition.§ 4402. Coverage for screenings, assessments and services.(a) Coverage required.--On or after the effective date of this subsection, the following shall provide coverage for screenings, behavioral health assessments and behavioral health services in conjunction with procedures under 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 6320 (relating to mandatory intake conference and screening in cases alleging delinquency), 6323 (relating to informal adjustment) and 6340 (relating to consent decree):(1) A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed 20260HB2477PN3327 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in this Commonwealth to a covered person.(2) A government program to an enrollee.(b) Limitations.--Coverage under this section shall be subject to copayment, deductible and coinsurance provisions and any other general exclusions or limitations of a health insurance policy or government program to the same extent as other health care services covered by the policy or program are subject to these provisions.(c) Contract required.--An insurer shall be required to contract with and accept as a participating provider behavioral health providers within its service area and enrolled in the Commonwealth's medical assistance program that agree to accept the payment levels, terms and conditions applicable to the insurer's other participating providers for behavioral health services.(d) Treatment plan review.--An insurer may review a treatment plan once every six months, subject to the insurer's utilization review requirements, including case management, concurrent review and other managed care provisions. The insurer and behavioral health provider developing the treatment plan may agree upon a more or less frequent review.(e) Review of denial.--(1) Upon denial or partial denial by an insurer of a claim for a screening, behavioral health assessment or behavioral health service under this section, a covered person or authorized representative shall be entitled to an expedited internal review process in accordance with Article XXI of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, followed by an expedited independent external review process, which the Insurance 20260HB2477PN3327 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department shall establish and administer.(2) An insurer, covered person or authorized representative may appeal to a court of competent jurisdiction a decision following the expedited independent external review process that provides for the denial or partial denial by an insurer of a claim for a screening, behavioral health assessment or behavioral health service under this section. Pending a ruling of the court, the insurer shall pay for the screening, behavioral health assessment or behavioral health service that has been authorized or ordered.(f) Rules and regulations.--The Insurance Commissioner may establish rules and the Insurance Department may promulgate regulations as may be necessary or appropriate to implement and administer this chapter.(g) Reports.--No later than January 1, 2029, and on each January 1 thereafter, each insurer shall make a report to the Insurance Department, in a form and manner as determined by the Insurance Department, to evaluate the implementation of this section.(h) Construction.--This section shall not be construed to limit benefits that are otherwise available to an individual under a health insurance policy or government program.(i) Applicability.--This section shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this section shall apply to policies for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither 20260HB2477PN3327 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Federal Government or the Insurance Department, this section shall apply to policies issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 2. The definitions of "child" and "screening" in section 6302 of Title 42 are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Behavioral health assessment." As defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 4401 (relating to definitions)."Behavioral health condition." As defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 4401."Behavioral health provider." As defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 4401."Behavioral health service." As defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 4401.* * *"Child." An individual who:(1) is under the age of 18 years;(2) is under the age of 21 years who committed an act of delinquency before reaching the age of 18 years; or(3) is under the age of 21 years and was adjudicated dependent before reaching the age of 18 years, who has requested the court to retain jurisdiction and who remains under the jurisdiction of the court as a dependent child because the court has determined that the child is:20260HB2477PN3327 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) completing secondary education or an equivalent credential;(ii) enrolled in an institution which provides postsecondary or [vocational] career and technical education;(iii) participating in a program actively designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;(iv) employed for at least 80 hours per month; or(v) incapable of doing any of the activities described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) due to a medical or behavioral health condition, which is supported by regularly updated information in the permanency plan of the child. * * *"Screening." A process, regardless of whether it includes the administration of a formal instrument, that is designed to identify a child who is at increased risk of having mental health, substance abuse or co-occurring mental health and substance abuse disorders that warrant immediate attention, intervention or more comprehensive assessment. The term includes a behavioral health assessment.* * *"Substance abuse disorder." As the term "substance use disorder" is defined in 40 Pa.C.S. § 4401.Section 3. Section 6306 of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 6306. Costs and expenses of care of child.(a) Payment for care.--The costs and expenses of the care of the child shall be paid as provided by sections 704.1 and 704.2 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the ["Public Welfare Code."] Human Services Code.20260HB2477PN3327 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Payment for behavioral health matters.--The costs and expenses of screenings, behavioral health assessments and behavioral health services in conjunction with procedures developed in accordance with sections 6320 (relating to mandatory intake conference and screening in cases alleging delinquency), 6323 (relating to informal adjustment) and 6340 (relating to consent decree) shall be paid as provided under 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 44 (relating to behavioral health benefits for justice-involved children).Section 4. Subchapter B of Chapter 63 of Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6320. Mandatory intake conference and screening in cases alleging delinquency.(a) Requirement.--In all cases alleging delinquency, a juvenile probation officer shall conduct an intake conference following the submission of a written allegation and before a petition for delinquency is filed under section 6334 (relating to petition).(b) Screening.--At the intake conference, or at any time before a petition for delinquency is filed, the probation officer of the child alleged to be delinquent or other officer designated by the court shall conduct a screening approved by the Juvenile Court Judges' Commission under section 6373 (relating to powers and duties), to determine whether a behavioral health assessment would be in the best interest of the public and the child. If the probation officer determines that a behavioral health assessment is in the best interest of the public and the child, the probation officer or other designated officer shall refer the child and the child's parent, guardian or other custodian to a public or private social agency 20260HB2477PN3327 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to conduct a behavioral health assessment as provided for under section 6323(a.1) (relating to informal adjustment).Section 5. Section 6323(a)(2) of Title 42 is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 6323. Informal adjustment.(a) General rule.--* * *(2) Similarly, the probation officer may in the case of [a delinquent child, or] a dependent child where the jurisdiction of the court is permitted under paragraph (6) of the definition of "dependent child" in section 6302, refer the child and his parents to an agency for assisting in the matter.* * *(a.1) Behavioral health assessments.--Except as provided under subsection (a.2), upon receipt of a referral under section 6320(b) (relating to mandatory intake conference and screening in cases alleging delinquency), the receiving public or private social agency shall indicate whether the agency will accept the child and perform a behavioral health assessment and shall report back to the referring officer within three months of receipt of the referral concerning the status of the referral. If a receiving agency accepts the child, the following apply:(1) Prior to conducting the behavioral health assessment, the agency shall obtain the consent of the child and the child's parent, guardian or other custodian.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the agency shall complete the behavioral health assessment within 30 days of receipt of the consents under paragraph (1).(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), if a behavioral 20260HB2477PN3327 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health assessment has been completed within the prior six months, the agency shall provide the referring officer with the report and recommendations from prior assessments.(4) If the behavioral health assessment conducted under this subsection reveals that the child has complex behavioral health needs and is at risk of placement away from the child's parent, guardian or other custodian, or is already involved in multiple service systems, the agency shall refer the child and the child's parent, guardian or other custodian for behavioral health services.(5) Following the behavioral health assessment, the agency shall prepare a report with recommendations. The report:(i) Shall be provided to the following:(A) The child.(B) The child's parent, guardian or other custodian.(C) The child's attorney.(D) The referring officer.(ii) Must include:(A) The agency's specific recommendation regarding whether a petition alleging delinquency should be filed and what process would be in the best interest of the public and the child.(B) Any r ecommendations for the treatment of a behavioral health condition.(C) Whether the agency referred the child for behavioral health services.(6) Unless the child, following consultation with the child's attorney, gives consent, the report and related 20260HB2477PN3327 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 documents, records and statements made by the child or others providing information for the purpose of a behavioral health assessment:(i) may not be used by law enforcement during its investigation; and(ii) shall not be admissible at an adjudicatory hearing or an adult criminal proceeding.(7) Prior to filing a petition alleging delinquency, the referring officer or prosecutor shall review the agency's report to screen the petition for participation in other voluntary services or diversion program.(8) If a petition alleging delinquency is filed following referral and the court adjudicates the child delinquent, with the consent of the child following consultation with the child's attorney, the report under this subsection shall be admissible at the dispositional hearing and subsequent hearings for the purpose of determining appropriate behavioral health services.(a.2) Exception.--(1) A petition alleging delinquency may be filed prior to the completion of the behavioral health assessment if:(i) the prosecutor or referring officer determines there is a need to request an order from the court for immediate detention or placement to protect the child or the community; or(ii) the child or the child's parent, guardian or other custodian does not consent to the behavioral health assessment.(2) If the child or the child's parent, guardian or other custodian does not consent to the behavioral health 20260HB2477PN3327 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assessment:(i) The agency shall report to the referring officer or prosecutor that the behavioral health assessment was declined.(ii) The prosecutor may proceed with a petition alleging delinquency and inform the court that the behavioral health assessment was declined.(3) The petitioner under this subsection shall identify why behavioral health services were not an appropriate disposition prior to seeking court involvement.(4) If the petition under this subsection is filed prior to the referral and behavioral health assessment and the child alleged to be delinquent has not had a behavioral health assessment in the prior six months, the agency shall make the behavioral health assessment available to the child or the child's parent, guardian or other custodian after the petition is filed. The confidentiality and admissibility of the report and related documents, records or statements shall be treated the same as behavioral health assessments completed prior to the filing of the petition.* * *Section 6. Section 6373 of Title 42 is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 6373. Powers and duties.The commission shall have the power and is required to do the following:* * *(5) Approve a screening tool for the use of law enforcement officers, probation officers and other officers designated by the court under section 6320 (relating to 20260HB2477PN3327 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mandatory intake conference and screening in cases alleging delinquency).(6) Develop screening, referral and behavioral health assessment procedures under sections 6320, 6323 (relating to informal adjustment) and 6340 (relating to consent decree).(7) Produce informational materials regarding the screening tool and procedures under paragraphs (5) and (6) and make the materials available to all law enforcement agencies, probation officers and other officers of the court in this Commonwealth who work with children alleged to be delinquent.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2477PN3327 - 14 - 123456789101112